Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Commonwealth Venture Fund

155.400.
Title. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

155.410.
Purpose. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

155.420.
Definitions. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

155.430.
Establishment and operation of fund. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

155.440.
Investment tax credits — Years — Carryovers. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

155.450.
Maximum credits. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

155.460.
Application of tax credit. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

155.470.
Procedure to receive tax credit. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

155.480.
Loss of credit through early redemption. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

155.490.
Reporting requirements. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]